Ohio, session 136, HB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.927 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.927. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northeastbound and 8
southwestbound lanes of Chillicothe Lancaster road between 9
Amanda Clearport road southwest and United States route number 10
twenty-two, in Fairfield county, shall be known as the "MSGT 11
Norman Michael Kilbarger Memorial Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14